Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2711
License; application; form; contents; fee.

(1) Applicants for a license shall apply in a form and in a medium as prescribed by the director. Each such form shall contain content as set forth by rule, regulation, instruction, or procedure of the director and may be changed or updated by the director in accordance with applicable law in order to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act and maintain consistency with Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry licensing standards and practices. The application shall state or contain, as applicable:

(a) The legal name and residential and business addresses of the applicant and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in conducting the applicant's business;

(b) A list of any criminal conviction of the applicant and any material litigation in which the applicant has been involved in the ten-year period next preceding the submission of the application;

(c) A description of any money transmission previously provided by the applicant and the money transmission that the applicant seeks to provide in this state;

(d) A list of the applicant's proposed authorized delegates and the locations in this state where the applicant and its authorized delegates propose to engage in money transmission;

(e) A list of other states in which the applicant is licensed to engage in money transmission and any license revocation, suspension, or other disciplinary action taken against the applicant in another state;

(f) Information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership proceeding affecting the applicant or a person in control of an applicant;

(g) A sample form of contract for authorized delegates, if applicable;

(h) A sample form of payment instrument or stored value, as applicable;

(i) The name and address of any federally insured depository financial institution through which the applicant plans to conduct money transmission;

(j) A certification that the applicant is not a foreign adversary person, along with sufficient information to enable the director to verify the veracity of the certification;

(k) A certification that each key individual and person in control of the applicant is not a foreign adversary person, along with sufficient information to enable the director to verify the veracity of the certification; and

(l) Any other information the Director or the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry reasonably requires with respect to the applicant.

(2) If an applicant is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other legal entity, the applicant shall also provide:

(a) The date of the applicant's incorporation or formation and state or country of incorporation or formation;

(b) If applicable, a certificate of good standing from the state or country in which the applicant was incorporated or formed;

(c) A brief description of the structure or organization of the applicant, including any parents or subsidiaries of the applicant, and whether any such parents or subsidiaries are publicly traded;

(d) The legal name, any fictitious or trade name, all business and residential addresses, and the employment, as applicable, of each key individual and person in control of the applicant in the ten-year period preceding the submission of the application;

(e) A list of any criminal convictions and material litigation for a person in control of the applicant that is not an individual that has been involved with the applicant in the ten-year period preceding the submission of the application;

(f) A copy of audited financial statements of the applicant for the most recent fiscal year and for the two-year period preceding the submission of the application or, if determined to be acceptable to the director, certified unaudited financial statements for the most recent fiscal year or any other period acceptable to the director;

(g) A certified copy of unaudited financial statements of the applicant for the most recent fiscal quarter;

(h) If the applicant is a publicly traded corporation, a copy of the most recent report filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934;

(i) If the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of:

(i) A corporation publicly traded in the United States, a copy of audited financial statements for the parent corporation for the most recent fiscal year or a copy of the parent corporation's most recent report filed pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; or

(ii) A corporation publicly traded outside the United States, a copy of similar documentation filed with the regulator of the parent corporation's domicile outside the United States;

(j) The name and address of the applicant's registered agent in this state; and

(k) Any other information the director reasonably requires with respect to the applicant.

(3) A nonrefundable application fee of one thousand five hundred dollars must accompany an application for a license under this section.

(4) Other than the nonrefundable application fee, the director may waive one or more requirements of this section or permit an applicant to submit other information in lieu of the required information.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 16;

Laws 2026, LB838, § 3.
July 18, 2026